District of Columbia statutes.
8-1778.47

Workforce development and employment plan.

In an effort to maximize employment opportunities to District residents, the Mayor shall establish a workforce development and employment plan that shall incorporate the first source hiring requirements of § 2-219.03, with priority given to employment of:

(1)

Residents of economically distressed neighborhoods;

(2)

Low-income individuals; and

(3)

Unemployed and underemployed residents.

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-183, § 307, 57 DCR 3406

History

Section 208 of D.C. Law 18-156 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 208. Workforce development and employment plan; Qualified Apprenticeship Programs.
“In an effort to maximize employment opportunities to District residents, the Mayor shall:
“(1) Establish a workforce development and employment plan, which shall incorporate the District’s first source agreement hiring requirement, with priority given to employment of:
“(A) Residents of economically distressed neighborhoods;
“(B) Low-income individuals; and
“(C) Unemployed and underemployed residents; and
“(2) Leverage Qualified Apprenticeship Programs to train individuals for advancement to living wage career path employment.”
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 18-156 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 208 of Energy Efficiency Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-324, March 1, 2010, 57 DCR 1851).

Emergency Legislation